test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_laavu_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - láávu: # ok LAAVU
    láávu+N+Sg+Nom:  láávu
    láávu+N+Sg+Gen:  láávu
    láávu+N+Sg+Acc:  láávu
    láávu+N+Sg+Ill:  láávun
    láávu+N+Sg+Loc:  láávust
    láávu+N+Sg+Com:  láávoin
    láávu+N+Sg+Abe:  lávuttáá
    láávu+N+Ess:  láávvun
    láávu+N+Par:  láávvud
    láávu+N+Pl+Nom:  láávuh
    láávu+N+Pl+Gen:  [láávui, lávui]
    láávu+N+Pl+Acc:  láávuid
    láávu+N+Pl+Ill:  láávoid
    láávu+N+Pl+Loc:  láávuin
    láávu+N+Pl+Com:  [lávuiguin, lávuigijn]
    láávu+N+Pl+Abe:  lávuittáá

  Noun - ááŋu: # ok LAAVU ááŋu:ááŋ7%^RCu 
    ááŋu+N+Sg+Nom:  ááŋu
    ááŋu+N+Sg+Gen:  ááŋu
    ááŋu+N+Sg+Acc:  ááŋu
    ááŋu+N+Sg+Ill:  ááŋun
    ááŋu+N+Sg+Loc:  ááŋust
    ááŋu+N+Sg+Com:  ááŋoin
    ááŋu+N+Sg+Abe:  áŋuttáá
    ááŋu+N+Ess:  ááŋŋun
    ááŋu+N+Par:  ááŋŋud
    ááŋu+N+Pl+Nom:  ááŋuh
    ááŋu+N+Pl+Gen: [ááŋui, áŋui]
    ááŋu+N+Pl+Acc:  ááŋuid
    ááŋu+N+Pl+Ill:  ááŋoid
    ááŋu+N+Pl+Loc:  ááŋuin
    ááŋu+N+Pl+Com:  [áŋuiguin, áŋuigijn]
    ááŋu+N+Pl+Abe:  áŋuittáá


  Noun - ráávhu: # ok LAAVU
    ráávhu+N+Sg+Nom:  ráávhu
    ráávhu+N+Sg+Gen:  ráávhu
    ráávhu+N+Sg+Acc:  ráávhu
    ráávhu+N+Sg+Ill:  ráávhun
    ráávhu+N+Sg+Loc:  ráávhust
    ráávhu+N+Sg+Com:  rávhoin
    ráávhu+N+Sg+Abe:  rávhuttáá
    ráávhu+N+Ess:  ráávhun
    ráávhu+N+Par:  ráávhud
    ráávhu+N+Pl+Nom:  ráávhuh
    ráávhu+N+Pl+Gen:  [ráávhui, rávhui]
    ráávhu+N+Pl+Acc:  ráávhuid
    ráávhu+N+Pl+Ill:  rávhoid
    ráávhu+N+Pl+Loc:  ráávhuin
    ráávhu+N+Pl+Com:  [rávhuiguin, rávhuigijn]
    ráávhu+N+Pl+Abe:  rávhuittáá

  Noun - táálu+v1: # ok
    táálu+v1+N+Sg+Nom:  táálu 
    táálu+v1+N+Sg+Gen:  táálu
    táálu+v1+N+Sg+Acc:  táálu
    táálu+v1+N+Sg+Ill:  táálun
    táálu+v1+N+Sg+Loc:  táálust
    táálu+v1+N+Sg+Com:  tááloin
    táálu+v1+N+Sg+Abe:  táluttáá
    táálu+v1+N+Ess:  táállun
    táálu+v1+N+Par:  táállud
    táálu+v1+N+Pl+Nom:  tááluh
    táálu+v1+N+Pl+Gen:  [táálui, tálui]
    táálu+v1+N+Pl+Acc:  tááluid
    táálu+v1+N+Pl+Ill:  tááloid
    táálu+v1+N+Pl+Loc:  tááluin
    táálu+v1+N+Pl+Com:  [táluiguin, táluigijn]
    táálu+v1+N+Pl+Abe:  táluittáá

  Noun - náálu: # ok LAAVU
    náálu+N+Sg+Nom:  náálu
    náálu+N+Sg+Gen:  náálu
    náálu+N+Sg+Acc:  náálu
    náálu+N+Sg+Ill:  náálun
    náálu+N+Sg+Loc:  náálust
    náálu+N+Sg+Com:  nááloin
    náálu+N+Sg+Abe:  náluttáá
    náálu+N+Ess:  náállun
    náálu+N+Par:  náállud
    náálu+N+Pl+Nom:  nááluh
    náálu+N+Pl+Gen: [náálui, nálui]
    náálu+N+Pl+Acc:  nááluid
    náálu+N+Pl+Ill:  nááloid
    náálu+N+Pl+Loc:  nááluin
    náálu+N+Pl+Com:  [náluiguin, náluigijn]
    náálu+N+Pl+Abe:  náluittáá

  Noun - stáálu+v1: # ok; LAAVU gč láátu. Mo bargat?
    stáálu+v1+N+Sg+Nom:  stáálu
    stáálu+v1+N+Sg+Gen:  stáálu
    stáálu+v1+N+Sg+Acc:  stáálu
    stáálu+v1+N+Sg+Ill:  stáálun
    stáálu+v1+N+Sg+Loc:  stáálust
    stáálu+v1+N+Sg+Com:  stááloin
    stáálu+v1+N+Sg+Abe:  stáluttáá
    stáálu+v1+N+Ess:  stáállun
    stáálu+v1+N+Par:  stáállud
    stáálu+v1+N+Pl+Nom:  stááluh
    stáálu+v1+N+Pl+Gen:  [stáálui, stálui]
    stáálu+v1+N+Pl+Acc:  stááluid
    stáálu+v1+N+Pl+Ill:  stááloid
    stáálu+v1+N+Pl+Loc:  stááluin
    stáálu+v1+N+Pl+Com:  [stáluiguin, stáluigijn]
    stáálu+v1+N+Pl+Abe:  stáluittáá

  Noun - jáámu: # ok LAAVU
    jáámu+N+Sg+Nom:  jáámu
    jáámu+N+Sg+Gen:  jáámu
    jáámu+N+Sg+Acc:  jáámu
    jáámu+N+Sg+Ill:  jáámun
    jáámu+N+Sg+Loc:  jáámust
    jáámu+N+Sg+Com:  jáámoin
    jáámu+N+Sg+Abe:  jámuttáá
    jáámu+N+Ess:  jáámmun
    jáámu+N+Par:  jáámmud
    jáámu+N+Pl+Nom:  jáámuh
    jáámu+N+Pl+Gen: [jáámui, jámui]
    jáámu+N+Pl+Acc:  jáámuid
    jáámu+N+Pl+Ill:  jáámoid
    jáámu+N+Pl+Loc:  jáámuin
    jáámu+N+Pl+Com:  [jámuiguin, jámuigijn]
    jáámu+N+Pl+Abe:  jámuittáá

  Noun - láátu+v1: # ok LAAVU
    láátu+v1+N+Sg+Nom:  láátu
    láátu+v1+N+Sg+Gen:  lááđu
    láátu+v1+N+Sg+Acc:  lááđu
    láátu+v1+N+Sg+Ill:  láátun
    láátu+v1+N+Sg+Loc:  lááđust
    láátu+v1+N+Sg+Com:  lááđoin
    láátu+v1+N+Sg+Abe:  láđuttáá
    láátu+v1+N+Ess:  lááttun
    láátu+v1+N+Par:  lááttud
    láátu+v1+N+Pl+Nom:  lááđuh
    láátu+v1+N+Pl+Gen:  [lááđui, láđui]
    láátu+v1+N+Pl+Acc:  lááđuid
    láátu+v1+N+Pl+Ill:  lááđoid
    láátu+v1+N+Pl+Loc:  lááđuin
    láátu+v1+N+Pl+Com:  [láđuiguin, láđuigijn]
    láátu+v1+N+Pl+Abe:  láđuittáá

  Noun - pááru+v1: # ok LAAVU
    pááru+v1+N+Sg+Nom:  pááru
    pááru+v1+N+Sg+Gen:  pááru
    pááru+v1+N+Sg+Acc:  pááru
    pááru+v1+N+Sg+Ill:  páárun
    pááru+v1+N+Sg+Loc:  páárust
    pááru+v1+N+Sg+Com:  páároin
    pááru+v1+N+Sg+Abe:  páruttáá
    pááru+v1+N+Ess:  páárrun
    pááru+v1+N+Par:  páárrud
    pááru+v1+N+Pl+Nom:  pááruh
    pááru+v1+N+Pl+Gen: [páárui, párui]
    pááru+v1+N+Pl+Acc:  pááruid
    pááru+v1+N+Pl+Ill:  páároid
    pááru+v1+N+Pl+Loc:  pááruin
    pááru+v1+N+Pl+Com:  [páruiguin, páruigijn]
    pááru+v1+N+Pl+Abe:  páruittáá

  Noun - máátu+v1: # ok LAAVU
    máátu+v1+N+Sg+Nom:  máátu
    máátu+v1+N+Sg+Gen:  mááđu 
    máátu+v1+N+Sg+Ill:  máátun
    máátu+v1+N+Sg+Loc:  mááđust 
    máátu+v1+N+Sg+Com:  mááđoin
    máátu+v1+N+Sg+Abe:  máđuttáá
    máátu+v1+N+Ess:  mááttun
    máátu+v1+N+Par:  mááttud
    máátu+v1+N+Pl+Nom:  mááđuh 
    máátu+v1+N+Pl+Gen: [mááđui, máđui]
    máátu+v1+N+Pl+Acc:  mááđuid
    máátu+v1+N+Pl+Ill:  mááđoid
    máátu+v1+N+Pl+Loc:  mááđuin
    máátu+v1+N+Pl+Com:  [máđuiguin, máđuigijn]
    máátu+v1+N+Pl+Abe:  máđuittáá

  Noun - tuálu: # ok LAAVU
    tuálu+N+Sg+Nom:  tuálu
    tuálu+N+Sg+Gen:  tuálu
    tuálu+N+Sg+Acc:  tuálu
    tuálu+N+Sg+Ill:  tuálun
    tuálu+N+Sg+Loc:  tuálust
    tuálu+N+Sg+Com:  tuáloin
    tuálu+N+Sg+Abe:  tuáluttáá
    tuálu+N+Ess:  tuállun
    tuálu+N+Par:  tuállud
    tuálu+N+Pl+Nom:  tuáluh
    tuálu+N+Pl+Gen:  tuálui
    tuálu+N+Pl+Acc:  tuáluid
    tuálu+N+Pl+Ill:  tuáloid
    tuálu+N+Pl+Loc:  tuáluin
    tuálu+N+Pl+Com:  [tuáluiguin, tuáluigijn]
    tuálu+N+Pl+Abe:  tuáluittáá

  Noun - luámu: # ok LAAVU
    luámu+N+Sg+Nom:  luámu
    luámu+N+Sg+Gen:  luámu
    luámu+N+Sg+Acc:  luámu
    luámu+N+Sg+Ill:  luámun
    luámu+N+Sg+Loc:  luámust
    luámu+N+Sg+Com:  luámoin
    luámu+N+Sg+Abe:  luámuttáá
    luámu+N+Ess:  luámmun
    luámu+N+Par:  luámmud
    luámu+N+Pl+Nom:  luámuh
    luámu+N+Pl+Gen:  luámui
    luámu+N+Pl+Acc:  luámuid
    luámu+N+Pl+Ill:  luámoid
    luámu+N+Pl+Loc:  luámuin
    luámu+N+Pl+Com:  [luámuiguin, luámuigijn]
    luámu+N+Pl+Abe:  luámuittáá

  Noun - tuámu: # ok LAAVU
    tuámu+N+Sg+Nom:  tuámu
    tuámu+N+Sg+Gen:  tuámu
    tuámu+N+Sg+Acc:  tuámu
    tuámu+N+Sg+Ill:  tuámun
    tuámu+N+Sg+Loc:  tuámust
    tuámu+N+Sg+Com:  tuámoin
    tuámu+N+Sg+Abe:  tuámuttáá
    tuámu+N+Ess:  tuámmun
    tuámu+N+Par:  tuámmud
    tuámu+N+Pl+Nom:  tuámuh
    tuámu+N+Pl+Gen:  tuámui
    tuámu+N+Pl+Acc:  tuámuid
    tuámu+N+Pl+Ill:  tuámoid
    tuámu+N+Pl+Loc:  tuámuin
    tuámu+N+Pl+Com:  [tuámuiguin, tuámuigijn]
    tuámu+N+Pl+Abe:  tuámuittáá

  Noun - tuáru: # ok LAAVU
    tuáru+N+Sg+Nom:  tuáru
    tuáru+N+Sg+Gen:  tuáru
    tuáru+N+Sg+Acc:  tuáru
    tuáru+N+Sg+Ill:  tuárun
    tuáru+N+Sg+Loc:  tuárust
    tuáru+N+Sg+Com:  tuároin
    tuáru+N+Sg+Abe:  tuáruttáá
    tuáru+N+Ess:  tuárrun
    tuáru+N+Par:  tuárrud
    tuáru+N+Pl+Nom:  tuáruh
    tuáru+N+Pl+Gen:  tuárui
    tuáru+N+Pl+Acc:  tuáruid
    tuáru+N+Pl+Ill:  tuároid
    tuáru+N+Pl+Loc:  tuáruin
    tuáru+N+Pl+Com:  [tuáruiguin, tuáruigijn]
    tuáru+N+Pl+Abe:  tuáruittáá

  Noun - vuáru+v1: # ok LAAVU
    vuáru+v1+N+Sg+Nom:  vuáru
    vuáru+v1+N+Sg+Gen:  vuáru
    vuáru+v1+N+Sg+Acc:  vuáru
    vuáru+v1+N+Sg+Ill:  vuárun
    vuáru+v1+N+Sg+Loc:  vuárust
    vuáru+v1+N+Sg+Com:  vuároin
    vuáru+v1+N+Sg+Abe:  vuáruttáá
    vuáru+v1+N+Ess:  vuárrun
    vuáru+v1+N+Par:  vuárrud
    vuáru+v1+N+Pl+Nom:  vuáruh
    vuáru+v1+N+Pl+Gen:  vuárui
    vuáru+v1+N+Pl+Acc:  vuáruid
    vuáru+v1+N+Pl+Ill:  vuároid
    vuáru+v1+N+Pl+Loc:  vuáruin
    vuáru+v1+N+Pl+Com:  [vuáruiguin, vuáruigijn]
    vuáru+v1+N+Pl+Abe:  vuáruittáá

  Noun - puáđu+v1: # ok LAAVU
    puáđu+v1+N+Sg+Nom:  puáđu
    puáđu+v1+N+Sg+Gen:  puáđu
    puáđu+v1+N+Sg+Acc:  puáđu
    puáđu+v1+N+Sg+Ill:  puáđun
    puáđu+v1+N+Sg+Loc:  puáđust
    puáđu+v1+N+Sg+Com:  puáđoin
    puáđu+v1+N+Sg+Abe:  puáđuttáá
    puáđu+v1+N+Ess:  puáđđun
    puáđu+v1+N+Par:  puáđđud
    puáđu+v1+N+Pl+Nom:  puáđuh
    puáđu+v1+N+Pl+Gen:  puáđui
    puáđu+v1+N+Pl+Acc:  puáđuid
    puáđu+v1+N+Pl+Ill:  puáđoid
    puáđu+v1+N+Pl+Loc:  puáđuin
    puáđu+v1+N+Pl+Com:  [puáđuiguin, puáđuigijn]
    puáđu+v1+N+Pl+Abe:  puáđuittáá

  Noun - muátu+v1: # ok LAAVU
    muátu+v1+N+Sg+Nom:  muátu
    muátu+v1+N+Sg+Gen:  muáđu
    muátu+v1+N+Sg+Acc:  muáđu
    muátu+v1+N+Sg+Ill:  muátun
    muátu+v1+N+Sg+Loc:  muáđust
    muátu+v1+N+Sg+Com:  muáđoin
    muátu+v1+N+Sg+Abe:  muáđuttáá
    muátu+v1+N+Ess:  muáttun
    muátu+v1+N+Par:  muáttud
    muátu+v1+N+Pl+Nom:  muáđuh
    muátu+v1+N+Pl+Gen:  muáđui
    muátu+v1+N+Pl+Acc:  muáđuid
    muátu+v1+N+Pl+Ill:  muáđoid
    muátu+v1+N+Pl+Loc:  muáđuin
    muátu+v1+N+Pl+Com:  [muáđuiguin, muáđuigijn]
    muátu+v1+N+Pl+Abe:  muáđuittáá

  Noun - piätu: # ok LAAVU
    piätu+N+Sg+Nom:  piätu
    piätu+N+Sg+Gen:  piäđu
    piätu+N+Sg+Acc:  piäđu
    piätu+N+Sg+Ill:  piätun
    piätu+N+Sg+Loc:  piäđust
    piätu+N+Sg+Com:  piäđoin
    piätu+N+Sg+Abe:  piäđuttáá
    piätu+N+Ess:  piättun
    piätu+N+Par:  piättud
    piätu+N+Pl+Nom:  piäđuh
    piätu+N+Pl+Gen:  piäđui
    piätu+N+Pl+Acc:  piäđuid
    piätu+N+Pl+Ill:  piäđoid
    piätu+N+Pl+Loc:  piäđuin
    piätu+N+Pl+Com:  [piäđuiguin, piäđuigijn]
    piätu+N+Pl+Abe:  piäđuittáá

  Noun - páájá:
    páájá+N+Sg+Nom:  páájá
    páájá+N+Sg+Gen:  páájá
    páájá+N+Sg+Acc:  páájá
    páájá+N+Sg+Ill:  pááján
    páájá+N+Sg+Loc:  páájást
    páájá+N+Sg+Com:  páájáin
    páájá+N+Sg+Abe:  pájáttáá
    páájá+N+Ess:  pááiján
    páájá+N+Par: pááijád
    páájá+N+Pl+Nom:  páájáh
    páájá+N+Pl+Gen:  [páájái, pájái]
    páájá+N+Pl+Acc:  páájáid
    páájá+N+Pl+Ill:  páájáid
    páájá+N+Pl+Loc:  páájáin
    páájá+N+Pl+Com:  [pájáiguin, pájáigijn]
    páájá+N+Pl+Abe:  pájáittáá

  Noun - čááná:
    čááná+N+Sg+Nom:  čááná
    čááná+N+Sg+Gen:  čááná
    čááná+N+Sg+Acc:  čááná
    čááná+N+Sg+Ill:  čáánán
    čááná+N+Sg+Loc:  čáánást
    čááná+N+Sg+Com:  čáánáin
    čááná+N+Sg+Abe:  čánáttáá
    čááná+N+Ess:  čáánnán
    čááná+N+Par:  čáánnád
    čááná+N+Pl+Nom:  [čáánáh, čánáh]
    čááná+N+Pl+Gen: [čáánái, čánái]
    čááná+N+Pl+Acc:  čáánáid
    čááná+N+Pl+Ill:  čáánáid
    čááná+N+Pl+Loc:  čáánáin
    čááná+N+Pl+Com:  [čánáiguin, čánáigijn]
    čááná+N+Pl+Abe:  čánáittáá

  Noun - vaarâ:
    vaarâ+N+Sg+Nom: vaarâ
    vaarâ+N+Sg+Gen: vaarâ
    vaarâ+N+Sg+Acc: vaarâ
    vaarâ+N+Sg+Ill: vaarân
    vaarâ+N+Sg+Loc: vaarâst
    vaarâ+N+Sg+Com: vaaráin
    vaarâ+N+Sg+Abe: varâttáá
    vaarâ+N+Ess: vaarrân
    vaarâ+N+Par: vaarrâd
    vaarâ+N+Pl+Nom: vaarah
    vaarâ+N+Pl+Gen: [vaarâi, varâi]
    vaarâ+N+Pl+Acc: vaarâid
    vaarâ+N+Pl+Ill: vaaráid
    vaarâ+N+Pl+Loc: vaarâin
    vaarâ+N+Pl+Com: [varâiguin, varâigijn]
    vaarâ+N+Pl+Abe: varâittáá

  Noun - tiätu: # u-stems - ok
    tiätu+N+Sg+Nom: tiätu
    tiätu+N+Sg+Gen: tiäđu
    tiätu+N+Sg+Acc: tiäđu
    tiätu+N+Sg+Ill: tiätun
    tiätu+N+Sg+Loc: tiäđust
    tiätu+N+Sg+Com: tiäđoin
    tiätu+N+Sg+Abe: tiäđuttáá
    tiätu+N+Ess: tiättun
    tiätu+N+Par: tiättud
    tiätu+N+Pl+Nom: tiäđuh
    tiätu+N+Pl+Gen: tiäđui
    tiätu+N+Pl+Acc: tiäđuid
    tiätu+N+Pl+Ill: tiäđoid
    tiätu+N+Pl+Loc: tiäđuin
    tiätu+N+Pl+Com: [tiäđuiguin, tiäđuigijn]
    tiätu+N+Pl+Abe: tiäđuittáá
